California, session 20252026, SB1219.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 384.6 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:384.6. Consistent with timelines established in this chapter for consolidation or closure of other programs, the commission shall consider and approve an application no later than 180 days after its filing if an electrical or gas corporation files an application to discontinue administration of an energy efficiency program or an energy efficiency portfolio for any of the following reasons:(a) The program is not cost effective in accordance with cost-efficiency metrics commonly utilized by the Public Utilities Commission.(b) The program is not reliable, meaning that the forecasted cost-effectiveness or total system benefits of the portfolio falls significantly under forecast for at least two years in a four-year cycle.(c) In the case of an electrical corporation, the program is not being used to meet unmet resource needs in its integrated resource planning framework, consistent with timelines established in this chapter for consolidation or closure of other programs.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.